Utah statutes.
77-27-5.5.   Review procedure -- Commutation.

(1)  The Board of Pardons and Parole may consider the commutation of a death sentence only to life without parole.

(2)  Only the person who has been sentenced to death or his counsel may petition the Board of Pardons and Parole for commutation.

(3)  The petition shall be in writing, signed personally by the person sentenced to death, and shall include a statement of the grounds upon which the petitioner seeks review.

(4)  The state shall be permitted to respond in writing to the petition as may be established by board rules.

(5)  The board shall review the petition and determine whether the petition presents a substantial issue which has not been reviewed in the judicial process.

(6)  The board shall not consider legal issues, including constitutional issues, which:

(a)  have been reviewed previously by the courts;

(b)  should have been raised during the judicial process; or

(c)  if based on new information, are subject to judicial review.

(7) (a)  If the board does not find a substantial issue, the board shall deny the hearing to the petitioner.

(b)  If the board finds a substantial issue, the board shall conduct a hearing in which the petitioner and the state may present evidence and argument as may be provided by board rules.



Amended by Chapter 13, 1994 General Session

